Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.100

Violations—Penalty—Prosecutions.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of each county to prosecute all cases involving a violation of this chapter arising within his or her county. The attorney general may assist in such prosecutions and shall appear at all hearings when requested to do so by the secretary of health.

[ 1991 c 3 s 50; 1979 c 158 s 34; 1923 c 16 s 36; RRS s 10030-36.]

NOTES:

Violation of chapter 69.50 RCW, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act—Suspension of license: RCW 69.50.413.